src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! # Meänkieli noun morphology

!! This file documents [`affixes/nouns.lexc`, the file for Meänkieli noun morphology](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-fit/blob/main/src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc)

!! ## This is an overview of the continuation lexicon types.

!! ### Special stems
!! * n_nomorph = uninflected nouns: covid-19
!! * nc = for consonant-final nouns, structure CVC (romani chib)
!! * 3nc = for triple-consonant-final (jiddisch)

!! ### Vowel stems
!! * n0 = 1syll  nouns: maa, suu, tie
!! * n1 = 2syll ordinary nouns: talo
!! * n_e = e-nouns; liike, säe, including odd-syll karpalheila (not -lla after 2 vow)
!! * n_vehke = vehe:vehke vehe:vehke; including variant form without -h: vehkheen AND vehkeen
!! * n_et = like n_e but including variant forms with -t in Sg+Nom; venet:vene, käärmet:käärme etc
!! * n3 = odd-syllabic ordinary nouns: hopea, ulvonta (NB: ulvonnoile but käräjille)
!! * n3_asia = like n3 but -ta-partitive added; asia>asiaa, asiata
!! * n3_ta = for 3-syll words ending with two different vowels not a/ä, like n3 except Sg Part: huomio>huomiota
!! * n3_lma = odd-syll nouns with a-drop in pl. AND double-cns (cf. sanonta>sanonoissa): ohjelma>ohjelmissa

!! ### Stems for -i-words, vowel AND consonant
!! * n4 = i:e nouns: suomi:suome, kivi:kive (2syll)
!! * n5 = i:e nouns, cns stems: lohi:lohe > lohen > lohta (2syll)
!! * n5_kasi = käsi:kä > käden > kättä (2syll)
!! * n5_troppi = 2syll nouns with i-stem in plural PLUS e-stem only in plural: äiti:äiti>äitile, äiteile
!! * n5_troppi_odd = odd-syll nouns of n5_troppi-type: alttari:alttari>alttarille (NB: alttareile)

!! ### Special cases for -i-words
!! * n5_lumi = lumi:lu > lumen > lunta (2syll)
!! * n5_lapsi = lapsi:la > lapsen > lasta
!! * n5_loimi = like n5_lumi PLUS Sg+Par loimea
!! * n5_vuosi = like n5_kasi PLUS variant forms without -o-: Sg+Gen vuen/vuoen etc
!! * n5_kieli = kieli:kiele like n5 PLUS Sg+Gen kielten
!! * n5_nuoret_pl = like n1_pl except Pl+Gen: nuoret>nuorten

!! ### Consonant stems of other types
!! * n_uus = vajavuus:vajavuu > vajavuuele
!! * n_uus_odd = miehuus:miehuu (NB: miehuuele BUT miehuksille)
!! * nc = cvc (t ex romani chib)
!! * 3nc = cvcvc (t ex jiddish)
!! * nen = nainen:nai >naisele
!! * 3nen = hevonen:hevo >hevoselle
!! * 3n_ks = keskus - keskuksen
!! * 4n_ks = even variants of 3n_ks; morahus:morahu > morahuksen, morahuksele
!! * n_äes = identical to 3n_ks except N+Sg+Nom (äes:äke)

!! * 3n_ue = lakeus - lakeude
!! * 3n_ime = puhelin - puhelime
!! * 3n_lnr = taimen, höyhen 
!! * 3n_kymmen = kymmen (like 3n_lnr plus Pl+Par kymmeniä) (2syll)
!! * 30n_lnr = sammal, askel (like 3n_lnr except Gen Ill Ine Ess) (2syll)
!! * nas = stam VVs; ankerias-ankerihaala, kauppias-kauppihaale (pga lång vokal+l), taivas-taihvaale
!! * 3mies = mies
!! * n_ien = ien

!! # The lexica themselves

!! ### Lexica for unassigned words
LEXICON nx
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** pointing to *n1*.
n1 ; ! nx

LEXICON n_nomorph
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for uninflected nouns
+N: K ; 

LEXICON nc ! romani chib
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for consonant-final nouns, structure CVC
+N: xc_sg ;
+N: xc_pl ;
+N+Pl+Ill:i^HMETA%>h^Vi2 n_PxK ;
+N+Pl+Ill:i^HMET2%>h^Vi2 n_PxK ;

LEXICON xc_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
+Sg+Nom: K ;
      :i x1_sg_oblique ;

LEXICON xc_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**
 x1_pl ;


!! ### Lexica for regular nouns

LEXICON n0
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for 1-syllabic: *maa, suu, tie, ...*
 +N: x0 ;
 +N+Nom: R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:%>n R ;

LEXICON n0_pl ! häät
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for plurals of the same: *häät*
 +N: x0_pl ;

LEXICON x0
 !! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** splitting to sg and pl
 x0_sg ;
 x0_pl ;

LEXICON x0_sg
 !! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** sg forms x0 point here
  +Sg+Nom:       PxK ; !!≈ * @CODE@ points to Px for noun
  x0_sg_oblique ; !!≈ *  @CODE@ points to oblique

LEXICON x0_sg_oblique
 !! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for oblique case forms in sg
  +Sg+Gen:%> n_PxK ;
  +Sg+Par:%>t^A PxK ;
  +Sg+Ill:%>h^V n_PxK ; ! maahan
  +Sg+Ine:%>ss^A PxK ;      ! maassa
  +Sg+Ela:%>st^A PxK ;      ! maasta
  +Sg+All:%>le PxxK ;        ! maale
  +Sg+Ade:%>l^A PxK ;       ! maala
  +Sg+Abl:%>lt^A PxK ;      ! maalta
  +Sg+Tra: TRA ;          ! maaksi
  +Sg+Ess:%>n^A PxK ;          ! maana
  +Sg+Abe:%>tt^A PxK ;      ! maatta

LEXICON x0_pl
 !! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for plural case forms
  +Pl+Nom:%> t_PxK ;
  +Pl+Gen:%>i2tte n_PxK ;
  +Pl+Par:%>i2t^A PxK ;
  +Pl+Ill:%>i2hi n_PxK ;  ! maihin
  +Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:%>i2hii n_PxK ;  ! maihiin, töihiin EK?
  +Pl+Ine:%>i2ss^A PxK ;
  +Pl+Ela:%>i2st^A PxK ;
  +Pl+All:%>i2le PxxK ;
  +Pl+Ade:%>i2l^A PxK ;
  +Pl+Abl:%>i2lt^A PxK ;
  +Pl+Tra:%>i2 TRA ;
  +Pl+Ess:%>i2n^A PxK ;
  +Pl+Abe:%>i2tt^A PxK ;



LEXICON n1
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for 2-syll ordinary nouns (*talo*)
 +N: x1 ;
 +N+Sg+Nom:       PxK ; !!≈ * @CODE@ Px separate
 +N+Nom: R ;
 +N+Sg+Gen:^WG%>n R ;

LEXICON n1_pl !
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for the same plural words (*urut*)
 +N: x1_pl ;


LEXICON x1
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for the bisyallbic, pointing to sg, pl
x1_sg ;
x1_pl ;

LEXICON n1_jen
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** for the bisyallbic, pointing to sg, pl PLUS plural genitive ending -jen
+N+Sg+Nom:       PxK ; !!≈ * @CODE@ Px separate
+N+Nom: R ;
+N+Sg+Gen:^WG%>n R ;
+N: x1_sg ;
+N: x1_pl ;
+N+Pl+Gen:%>i2e n_PxK ;

LEXICON x1_sg
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** bisyllabic sg
+Sg+Nom: K ;
 x1_sg_oblique ; !!≈ * @CODE@  the rest

LEXICON x1_sg_oblique
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** gives the rest
 +Sg+Gen:^WG%> n_PxK ; !!≈ * @CODE@ ! lagt till underscore
 +Sg+Par:%>^A PxK ; !!≈ * @CODE@
 +Sg+Ill:^HMETA%>h^V^V n_PxK ; !!≈ * @CODE@ saunhaan 
 +Sg+Ill:^HMET2%>h^V^V n_PxK ; !!≈ * @CODE@ talhoon, sauhnaan 
 +Sg+Ine:^WG%>ss^A PxK ;      !!≈ * @CODE@  etc.
 +Sg+Ela:^WG%>st^A PxK ;      ! talosta
 +Sg+All:^WG%>le PxxK ;        ! talole
 +Sg+Ade:^WG%>l^A PxK ;       ! talola
 +Sg+Abl:^WG%>lt^A PxK ;      ! talolta
 +Sg+Tra:^WG TRA ;          ! taloksi
 +Sg+Ess:%>n^A PxK ;          ! talona
 +Sg+Abe:^WG%>tt^A PxK ;      ! talotta

LEXICON x1_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** the pl forms
 +Pl+Nom:^WG%> t_PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen:^WG^IDEL%>i2tte n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:^WG%>i2e n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:%>i2e n_PxK ;
 +Pl+Par:%>i2^A PxK ; 
 +Pl+Ill:^HMETA%>h^Vi2 n_PxK ;  ! saunhoin 
 +Pl+Ill:^HMET2%>h^Vi2 n_PxK ;  ! sauhnoin 
 +Pl+Ine:^WG%>i2ss^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Ela:^WG%>i2st^A PxK ;
 +Pl+All:^WG%>i2le PxxK ;
 +Pl+Ade:^WG%>i2l^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Abl:^WG%>i2lt^A PxK ;
 +Pl+Tra:^WG%>i2 TRA ;
 +Pl+Ess:%>i2n^A PxK ; 
 +Pl+Abe:^WG%>i2tt^A PxK ;



LEXICON n_e
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  vene, liike, säe
 +N: x_e ;
 +N+Nom: R ;
 +N+Gen:he%>en R ;

LEXICON n_e_pl
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@**  vehkheet
 +N: x_e_pl ;

LEXICON x_e
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** splits in sg and pl
 x_e_sg ;
 x_e_pl ;

LEXICON x_e_sg ! nyare lånord, tex "nalle" böjs -heen i illativ
!! **LEXICON @LEXNAME@** the sg
 +Sg+Nom:^WG     PxK ; ! liike, liikkekki
 +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:^WG t_PxK ; ! liiket, liikkekki
 +Sg+Gen:h%>ee n_PxK ; ! liikheen, säkheen, ainheen !TEST stryka WG före h?
 +Sg+Gen:^HMET2%>hee n_PxK ; ! aihneen, liihkeen
 +Sg+Par:^WG%>tt^A PxK ; ! liikettä, säettä 
 +Sg+Ill:h%>eeshee n_PxK ; ! liikheesheen !TEST stryka WG före h?
 +Sg+Ill:^HMET2%>heeshee n_PxK ; ! aihneesheen
 +Sg+Ine:h%>eess^A   PxK ; ! liikheessä, säkheessä, ainheessa !TEST stryka WG före h?
 +Sg+Ine:^HMET2%>heess^A   PxK ; ! NY aihneessa 
 +Sg+Ela:h%>eest^A   PxK ; ! liikheestä, säkheestä !TEST stryka WG före h?
 +Sg+Ela:^HMET2%>heest^A   PxK ; ! NY aihneesta
 +Sg+All:h%>eele    PxxK ; ! liikheele, liihkeelekki !TEST stryka WG före h?
 +Sg+All:^HMET2%>heele    PxxK ; ! NY
 +Sg+Ade:h%>eel^A    PxK ; ! liikheelä, säkheelä !TEST stryka WG före h?
 +Sg+Ade:^HMET2%>heel^A    PxK ; ! NY
 +Sg+Abl:h%>eelt^A   PxK ; ! liikheeltä, säkheeltä !TEST stryka WG före h?
 +Sg+Abl:^HMET2%>heelt^A   PxK ; ! NY
 +Sg+Tra:h%>ee TRA ; !TEST stryka WG före h?
 +Sg+Tra:^HMET2%>hee TRA ; ! NY
 +Sg+Ess:h%>een^A PxK ; !TEST stryka WG före h?
 +Sg+Ess:^HMET2%>heen^A PxK ; ! NY
 +Sg+Abe:%>ett^A PxK ;
