src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!≈ * **@CODE@**
luhtamaa:luhta#maa n0 ;
potaatimaa:potaati#maa n0 ;
kuusikkomaa:kuusikko#maa n0 ;
vesitysmaa:vesitys#maa n0 ;
kylvöliha:kylvö#liha n1 ;
kaalsuhat:kaalsuha n1_pl ;
maarraja:maarraja n1 ;
koppelivilja:koppelivilja n1 ;
kellonviljat:kellonvilja n1_pl ;
lotja:lotja n1 ;
vallapihka:valla#pihka n1 ;
kuunaika:kuun#aika n1 ;
linnumpoika:linnum#poika n1 ;
roikka:roikka n1 ;
kenkilanka:kenkilanka nx ;
kirjanniskat:kirjan#niska n1_pl ;
jäähalkema:jäähalkema nx ;
valmat:valma n1_pl ;
puukaara:puukaara nx ;
vaarat:vaara n1_pl ;
lentosonta:lentosonta nx ;
vesirotta:vesi#rotta n1 ;
pikkukartat:pikku#kartta n1_pl ;
vuohikarvat:vuohi#karva n1_pl ;
talvikarva:talvikarva nx ;
ketunrauvat:ketun#rauva n1_pl ;
romani% chib:romani% chib nc ;
kirjanoppinheet:kirjan#oppine n_e_pl ;
idee:idee n0 ;
perselyhe:perse#lyhe n_e ;
oksatie:oksa#tie n0 ;
kivikkotie:kivikko#tie n0 ;
ärje:ärje n_e ;
vehkheet:vehk2e n_e_pl ;
hevosvehkheet:hevos#vehk2e n_e_pl ;
mettäsaareke:mettä#saarekke n_e ;
ottuke:ottukke n_e ;
palkheet:palk2e n_e_pl ;
poljinpalkheet:poljin#palk2e n_e_pl ;
tankopalkheet:tanko#palk2e n_e_pl ;
vyölänget:vyö#länke n1_pl ;
vilske:vilske n_e ;
liekkikappale:liekki#kappale n_e ;
juolle:juolle n_e ;
porttihame:porttihame n_e ;
polane:polane n_e ;
kipenheet:kip2ene n_e_pl ;
kirjotusainheet:kirjotus#aine n_e_pl ;
palampaine:palampaine n_e ;
vaaatehuone:vaaate#huone n_e ;
tyyne:tyyne n_e ;
varpheet:varp2e n_e_pl ;
nenävarpheet:nenä#varp2e n_e_pl ;
utarheet:utare n_e_pl ;
pieksämätantere:pieksämätantere n_e ;
leikkiase:leikkiase n_e ;
potaatiliisheet:potaati#liise n_e_pl ;
kaatheet:kaat2e n_e_pl ;
matkavaatheet:matka#vaat2e n_e_pl ;
jahtivaatheet:jahti#vaat2e n_e_pl ;
alusvaatheet:alus#vaat2e n_e_pl ;
kesäpyhävaatheet:kesäpyhä#vaat2e n_e_pl ;
iilisae:iili#sate n_e ;
paare:paarte n_e ;
luistheet:luiste n_e_pl ;
villavaate:villa#vaatte n_e ;
viipate:viipatte n_e ;
jauholautheet:jauho#laut2e n_e_pl ;
kue:kue n_e ;
tarve:tarve n_e ;
perjantai:perjan#tai n0 ;
ymmyräsuutongit:ymmyrä#suutongi n1_pl ;
ääripiit:ääri#pii n0_pl ;
slaskit:slaski n1_pl ;
mangnesyyli:mangnesyyli nx ;
moturi:moturi nx ;
traksit:traksi n1_pl ;
evankeeljum:evankeeljum nc ;
sahajauhot:saha#jauho n1_pl ;
valtiot:valtio n1_pl ;
rako:rako n1 ;
rinnanleikko:rinnanleikko n1 ;
linnarruokko:linnarruokko n1 ;
peräjatko:peräjatko n1 ;
kielikello:kielikello n1 ;
vuono:vuono n1 ;
ventoporo:ventoporo n1 ;
tieto:tieto n1_jen ;
ehto:ehto n1 ;
koukkuruoto:koukkuruoto n1 ;
tulipoltto:tulipoltto n1 ;
kasvot:kasvo n1_pl ;
työneuvot:työneuvo n1_pl ;
pöläkheet:pöläk2e n_e_pl ;
kolkkauskalkut:kolkkauskalkku n1_pl ;
naukku:naukku nx ;
pelmut:pelmu n1_pl ;
lupsu:lupsu nx ;
lökähousut:lökä#housu n1_pl ;
kullikuu:kulli#kuu n0 ;
syänkuut:syän#kuu n0_pl ;
pakkaskuut:pakkas#kuu n0_pl ;
köyrykuut:köyry#kuu n0_pl ;
kesäkuut:kesä#kuu n0_pl ;
olkaluu:olka#luu n0 ;
kalloluut:kalloluu n0_pl ;
puut:puu n0_pl ;
pohjapuu:pohja#puu n0 ;
luomapuut:luoma#puu n0_pl ;
kapustapuu:kapusta#puu n0 ;
paininpuu:painin#puu n0 ;
kaulauspuut:kaulaus#puu n0_pl ;
pannupuu:pannu#puu n0 ;
vanutuspuut:vanutuspuu n0_pl ;
lökäpöksyt:lökäpöksy n1_pl ;
koskusläjä:koskusläjä nx ;
pönkkä:pönkkä n1 ;
imeläleipä:imeläleipä nx ;
kellonperät:kellon#perä n1_pl ;
porejää:pore#jää n0 ;
äkkipää:äkki#pää n0 ;
unenpää:unen#pää n0 ;
kehräpää:kehrä#pää n0 ;
pöllö:pöllö n1 ;
kotityö:koti#työ n0 ;
mäkivyöt:mäki#vyö n0_pl ;
covid-19 n_nomorph ;
jpg n_nomorph ;
molemin% puolin:molemin% puolin n_nomorph ;
päälisin% puolin:päälisin% puolin n_nomorph ;
kaikin% puolin:kaikin% puolin n_nomorph ; 
silmin:silmin n_nomorph ; 
syyrströmminki:syyrströmminki nx ;
säsongityö:säsongi#työ n0 ;
sähkyvika:sähkyvika nx ;
haue:haue nx ;
moraali:moraali nx ;
oktaaniarvo:oktaaniarvo nx ;
kraviaiskostyymi:kraviaiskostyymi nx ;
ylävuoninki:ylävuoninki nx ;
päivätrakta:päivätrakta nx ;
pikkutyö:pikku#työ n0 ;
perustieto:perus#tieto n1_jen ;
persoonatieto:persoonatieto n1_jen ;
likipaikka:likipaikka nx ;
vaateparseli:vaateparseli nx ;
konettieto:konet#tieto n1_jen ; !Je
konetieto:kone#tieto n1_jen ;
kellarintrappu:kellarintrappu nx ;
